Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1719
Transaction; accounts or contracts authorized; director; adopt rules and regulations.

(1) Section 8-1717 shall not apply to the following:

(a) An account, agreement, or transaction within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission as granted under the Commodity Exchange Act;

(b) A commodity contract for the purchase of one or more precious metals which requires, and under which the purchaser receives, within twenty-eight calendar days from the payment of any portion of the purchase price, physical delivery of the total quantity of the precious metals purchased. For purposes of this subsection, physical delivery shall be deemed to have occurred if, within such twenty-eight-day period, the total quantity of precious metals purchased is delivered, whether in specifically segregated or fungible bulk form, into the possession of a depository, other than the seller, which is either (i) a financial institution, (ii) a depository, the warehouse receipts of which are recognized for delivery purposes for any commodity on a contract market designated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, (iii) a storage facility licensed or regulated by the United States or any agency thereof, or (iv) a depository designated by the director, and such depository issues and the purchaser receives, a certificate, document of title, confirmation, or other instrument evidencing that the total quantity of precious metals purchased has been delivered to the depository and is being and will continue to be held by the depository on the purchaser's behalf, free and clear of all liens and encumbrances, other than liens of the purchaser, tax liens, liens agreed to by the purchaser, or liens of the depository for fees and expenses, which have previously been disclosed to the purchaser;

(c) A commodity contract solely between persons engaged in producing, processing, using commercially, or handling as merchants, each commodity subject to such contract or any byproduct of such commodity;

(d) A commodity contract under which the offeree or the purchaser is a person referred to in section 8-1718, an insurance company, an investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, or an employee pension and profit-sharing or benefit plan other than a self-employed individual retirement plan or individual retirement account; or

(e) A commodity contract which requires, and under which the purchaser receives, within twenty-eight calendar days from the payment of any portion of the purchase price, physical delivery of the total amount of each commodity to be purchased under the contract or agreement.

(2) The director may adopt and promulgate or issue rules, regulations, or orders prescribing the terms and conditions of all transactions and contracts covered by the Commodity Code, which are not within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission as granted by the Commodity Exchange Act, exempting any person or transaction from any provision of the Commodity Code conditionally or unconditionally and otherwise implementing such code for the protection of purchasers and sellers of commodities.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 283, § 6.